Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.14.220

Reinstatement following administrative dissolution—Application.

(1) A corporation administratively dissolved under RCW 23.95.610 may apply to the secretary of state for reinstatement in accordance with RCW 23.95.615.

[ 2015 c 176 s 2128; 2006 c 52 s 13; 1995 c 47 s 2; 1989 c 165 s 162.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.